California, session 20252026, SB859.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 16401.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:16401.5. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 16400 and 16401, the California State Lottery may draw funds from its continuous appropriation for the purpose of making immediate payment through its revolving fund to California State Lottery prizewinners of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, provided that regulations to support the action are adopted by the California State Lottery Commission. The California State Lottery shall be subject to all reporting and compliance requirements mandated by this article.(b) The California State Lottery shall maintain records of all payments made pursuant to subdivision (a).